California, session 20252026, AB527.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3731 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:3731. (a) The log described in Section 3730 shall show the character and depth of the formation passed through or encountered in the drilling of the well, the amount, size and weight of casing used, and particularly the location, depth and temperature of water-bearing strata, together with the temperature, chemical composition, and other chemical and physical characteristics of fluid encountered from time to time, so far as ascertained.(b) For a well that is part of a geothermal exploratory project exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) pursuant to Section 21080.67 employing enhanced geothermal system technology, the log shall include the chemical and physical characteristics of well stimulation fluids, including additives and proppants, as defined in Sections 3150 and 3154, respectively, if any, and the amounts used for well stimulation.SEC. 2. Section 3738 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:3738. (a) On or before January 1, 2029, the division shall promulgate regulations for enhanced geothermal system wells, as part of an update to regulations for geothermal wells, that explicitly include and address all of the following:(1) Seismic risks.(2) Well construction, including the required material composition and construction design for the entire range of anticipated subsurface conditions, and the chemical composition and physical properties of the geologic formations and any geologic fluids.(3) Fracture propagation from well stimulation.(4) Geologic and hydrologic isolation of the geothermal fluids and reservoir. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the division incorporate the development of regulations pursuant to this section in its existing effort to update geothermal regulations, previously workshopped by the division in 2018 and 2022, that is already underway to support the development of enhanced geothermal systems. (c) Before the promulgation and implementation of enhanced geothermal system well regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), the operator, when filing a written notice of intent to commence drilling pursuant to Section 3724 for a well in a geothermal exploratory project exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) pursuant to Section 21080.67 employing enhanced geothermal system technology, shall provide to the supervisor all of the following information:(1) The type of well and intended use, purpose, and approximate volume rates of injection of any well stimulation fluids.(2) A plan for seismic monitoring and risk-based mitigation consistent with the United States Department of Energy “Protocol for Addressing Induced Seismicity Associated with Enhanced Geothermal Systems,” published in January 2012, that meets or exceeds the monitoring requirements of Section 1785.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) Full disclosure of the anticipated composition and disposition of well stimulation fluids, if planned to be used. This disclosure shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:(A) The anticipated date of the well stimulation treatment.(B) A complete list of names, Chemical Abstract Service (CAS) numbers, and the maximum concentration, in percent by mass, of each and every chemical constituent of the well stimulation fluids anticipated to be used. If a CAS number does not exist for a chemical constituent, the owner or operator may provide another unique identifier, if available.(C) The trade name, the supplier, concentration, and a brief description of the intended purpose of each additive, as defined by Section 3150, including any proppants, as defined in Section 3154, contained in the anticipated well stimulation fluid.(D) The location of the portion of the well subject to the well stimulation treatment and the extent of the fracturing or other modification, if any, in the geologic formation surrounding the well induced by the treatment. (4) (A) The information provided pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, is not confidential information pursuant to Section 3752.(B) The information provided pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, may be provided to the supervisor with the first application for a written notice of intent to commence drilling pursuant to Section 3724 for a well in a geothermal exploratory project exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) pursuant to Section 21080.67 and may be referenced in subsequent applications for the same project if the same information applies to all wells.(d) (1) This section does not prohibit the supervisor from asking for additional pertinent data in considering the written notice of intent to commence drilling pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3724.(2) Before the promulgation of the regulations pursuant to subdivision (a), this section does not prohibit the supervisor from approving wells that use all methods and practices known to the industry for the purpose of increasing the ultimate recovery of geothermal resources that, in each case, the supervisor deems suitable for these purposes. SEC. 3. Section 21065.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21065.5. “Geothermal exploratory project” means a project as defined in Section 21065 composed of not more than six wells and associated drilling and testing equipment, including equipment and activities necessary to establish interconnectivity between wells and reservoirs, temporary roads, electric distribution lines, and infrastructure to provide power for drilling and testing equipment, whose chief and original purpose is to evaluate the presence and characteristics of geothermal resources before commencement of a geothermal field development project as defined in Section 65928.5 of the Government Code. Wells included within a geothermal exploratory project, excluding wells connecting to geothermal reservoirs whose permeability or capacity to allow the flow of geothermal fluids, including water, has been increased from its natural or original state through stimulation, horizontal drilling, the use of closed-loop configurations, or other techniques, shall be located at least one-half mile from geothermal development wells that are capable of producing geothermal resources in commercial quantities.SEC. 4. Section 21080.67 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.67. (a) This division does not apply to a geothermal exploratory project, as defined in Section 21065.5, for which a county or the Geologic Energy Management Division is the lead agency pursuant to Section 3715.5, including any permit, funding, or other approval by a state or local agency for the geothermal exploratory project as may be required by this division, if the lead agency determines that the geothermal exploratory project meets all of the following conditions:(1) The project does not include the production of geothermal resources in commercial quantities.(2) The project site is not more than 20 acres total at the surface and the project site does not disturb more than 12 acres of previously undisturbed ground at the surface. For purposes of this paragraph, “undisturbed” means in a natural state without industrial or other development.(3)  The project site does not include, or lie within 100 feet of, any of the following:(A) A site that is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.(B) Rivers, streams, or riparian corridors, except temporary road or electric distribution line crossings. Temporary road or electrical distribution line crossings shall be undertaken pursuant to an agreement issued by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code, as applicable.(C) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or a habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.(D) Identified habitat for species of special status identified by state or federal agencies, including species protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), and any species identified as fully protected pursuant to Sections 3511, 4700, 5050, and 5515 of the Fish and Game Code.(E) Lands with a conservation easement unless consistent with the terms or requirements of the easement. (4) The project site does not include, or lie within, 300 feet of wetlands, as described in subdivision (l) of Section 21067.5.(5) Wells included within the project are set back at the surface at least 100 feet from a public road and at least 300 feet from a building that is open to the public, if present, and the property line of any adjacent properties that are not affiliated with the project or the project applicant.(6) The project will not result in significant adverse impacts to any of the following: (A) Natural resources, including sensitive habitats and any species of special status identified by state or federal agencies, including species protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), and any species identified as fully protected pursuant to Sections 3511, 4700, 5050, and 5515 of the Fish and Game Code.(B) Hydrological resources, including rivers, streams, wetlands, groundwater wells, springs, and aquifers.(C) Tribal, historical, and other cultural resources.(7) The project applicant has provided to the lead agency a legally binding commitment to comply with Section 21183.5. (8) The project applicant has submitted to the lead agency a preliminary description of the anticipated composition of fluids to be used for any hydraulic fracturing operations expected to occur in the geothermal exploratory project, if applicable.(9) Unusual circumstances do not exist that would cause the project to have a significant adverse impact on the environment.(b) (1) The project developer shall conduct a reconnaissance survey using best practices, including the identification of relevant protocols and guidelines used in conducting the survey, and shall supply the lead agency with the reconnaissance survey when applying for an exemption from this division pursuant to this section. The reconnaissance survey shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:(A) The identification of natural resources including sensitive species of flora and fauna, sensitive habitats and hydrological resources including rivers, streams, wetlands, groundwater wells, springs, and aquifers. The reconnaissance survey shall include a biological resources survey that shall, at a minimum, identify any species of special status identified by state or federal agencies, including species protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code), and any species identified as fully protected pursuant to Sections 3511, 4700, 5050, and 5515 of the Fish and Game Code. (B) The identification of any tribal, historical, and other cultural resources.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “reconnaissance survey” means a survey of a proposed geothermal exploratory project site conducted before applying for an exemption from this division pursuant to this section. A reconnaissance survey does not need to include the level of detail required in an initial study.(c) (1) Upon receipt of an application for a project pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall engage in a scoping consultation regarding the proposed development with a California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area, as described in Section 21080.3.1, of the proposed geothermal exploratory project in order to determine whether the project will result in significant adverse impacts to a tribal cultural resource. In order to expedite compliance with this subdivision, the lead agency shall contact the Native American Heritage Commission for assistance in identifying any California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed geothermal exploratory project.(2) The timeline for noticing and commencing a scoping consultation pursuant to this section shall be as follows:(A) The lead agency shall provide a formal notice of an application pursuant to this section to each California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development within 30 days of receiving that application.(B) Each California Native American tribe that receives a formal notice shall have 30 days from the receipt of that notice to accept the invitation to engage in a scoping consultation.(C) If the lead agency receives a response accepting an invitation to engage in a scoping consultation, the lead agency shall commence the scoping consultation within 30 days of receiving that response.(3) The scoping consultation shall recognize that California Native American tribes traditionally and culturally affiliated with a geographic area have knowledge and expertise concerning the resources at issue and shall take into account the cultural significance of the resources to the culturally affiliated California Native American tribe.(4) (A) The parties to a scoping consultation conducted pursuant to this subdivision shall be the lead agency and any California Native American tribe traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed geothermal exploratory project.(B) More than one California Native American tribe traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed geothermal exploratory project may participate in the scoping consultation. Upon request by any of the participating California Native American tribes, the lead agency shall engage in a separate scoping consultation with that California Native American tribe.(5) The applicant and the applicant’s consultants may participate in a scoping consultation process conducted pursuant to this subdivision if all of the following conditions are met:(A) The applicant and the applicant’s consultants agree to respect the principles set forth in this subdivision.(B) The applicant and the applicant’s consultants engage in the scoping consultation in good faith.(C) The California Native American tribe participating in the scoping consultation approves the participation of the applicant and the applicant’s consultants. The California Native American tribe may rescind its approval at any time during the scoping consultation, either for the duration of the scoping consultation or for any particular meeting or discussion held as part of the scoping consultation.(6) The participants to a scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the following confidentiality requirements:(A) Section 7927.000 of the Government Code.(B) Section 7927.005 of the Government Code.(C) Subdivision (c) of Section 21082.3.(D) Subdivision (d) of Section 15120 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.(E) Any additional confidentiality standards adopted by the California Native American tribe participating in the scoping consultation.(7) A scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be concluded if either of the following occurs:(A) The parties to the scoping consultation document an enforceable agreement concerning methods, measures, and conditions to avoid or address potential impacts to tribal cultural resources that are or may be present.(B) One or more parties to the scoping consultation, acting in good faith and after reasonable effort, conclude that a mutual agreement on methods, measures, and conditions to avoid or address impacts to tribal cultural resources that are or may be present cannot be reached.(8) This division shall not apply to a scoping consultation pursuant to this subdivision.(9) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:(A) “Consultation” means the meaningful and timely process of seeking, discussing, and considering carefully the views of others, in a manner that is cognizant of all parties’ cultural values and, where feasible, seeking agreement. Consultation between local governments and California Native American tribes shall be conducted in a way that is mutually respectful of each party’s sovereignty. Consultation shall also recognize the tribes’ potential needs for confidentiality with respect to places that have traditional tribal cultural importance. A lead agency shall consult the tribal consultation best practices described in the “State of California Tribal Consultation Guidelines: Supplement to General Plan Guidelines” prepared by the former Office of Planning and Research.(B) “Scoping” means the act of participating in early discussions or investigations between a local government and a California Native American tribe, and the development proponent if authorized by the California Native American tribe, regarding the potential effects a proposed development could have on a potential tribal cultural resource, as defined in Section 21074, or California Native American tribe as defined in Section 21073.(C) “Tribal cultural resource” means a site, feature, place, cultural landscape, sacred place, including a Native American sanctified cemetery, Indian cemetery, or Indian burial area, or an object with cultural value to a California Native American tribe that is any of the following:(i) Included or eligible for inclusion in the California Register of Historical Resources or the National Register of Historic Places.(ii) Included in a local register of historical resources as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1.(iii) Included in a tribal government register maintained by a Tribal Historic Preservation Officer approved by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to Section 101 of the federal National Historic Preservation Act (54 U.S.C. Sec. 300101 et seq.).(iv) Identified by the Native American Heritage Commission as a sacred place pursuant to Section 5097.94 or 5097.96.(d) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, the requirements of Section 21183.5 shall apply. (e) (1) The lead agency may require the project applicant to file an indemnity bond before it makes its determination pursuant to subdivision (a). The bond, in a form and manner prescribed by the lead agency, shall be in an amount sufficient to secure any supplemental costs beyond the applicant’s bonding requirements with the Geologic Energy Management Division, pursuant to Section 3725, to secure full reclamation of the project site.(2) If a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, the project shall include full reclamation of all well pads, temporary routes, and other disturbances, including the reestablishment of vegetative cover with native plants, unless those disturbances are incorporated into a subsequent geothermal field development project, as defined in Section 65928.5 of the Government Code. (f) At least 30 days before making a determination to approve a geothermal exploratory project as exempt from this division pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall post a written notice of the intent to apply the exemption at the project site and post a written notice of the intent to apply the exemption and the entire project application on its internet website.(g) If the lead agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out the project, the lead agency shall file a notice with the State Clearinghouse in the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and with the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21152. The lead agency shall provide a copy of the notice filed with the State Clearinghouse to the Department of Fish and Wildlife and the relevant California regional water quality control board.(h) If a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, when making a filing pursuant to Section 3735 to the Geologic Energy Management Division of the Department of Conservation, the project developer shall include a disclosure of the composition of fluids used in all relevant hydraulic fracturing operations, and shall file a copy of the disclosure with the lead agency, if applicable.(i) For purposes of this section, “project site” means land that is altered at the surface for a geothermal exploratory project that is seeking an exemption from this division pursuant to this section. “Project site” shall not necessarily include the entire property on which the project is located.(j) This section is not intended, and shall not be construed, to limit consultation and discussion between a local agency and a California Native American tribe pursuant to other applicable law, confidentiality provisions pursuant to other applicable law, the protection of religious exercise to the fullest extent permitted pursuant to state and federal law, or the ability of a California Native American tribe to submit information to the local agency or participate in any process of the local agency.(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 21080.71 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.71. A geothermal field development project located on a site where a geothermal exploratory project was deployed pursuant to Section 21080.67 shall use a baseline for review pursuant to this division that reflects the site before the deployment of the geothermal exploratory project as identified in subdivision (b) of Section 21080.67.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.